Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 1. Declaration of Policy; Plan of Cooperation.

§ 51.5-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the Commonwealth to encourage and enable persons with disabilities to participate fully and equally in the social and economic life of the Commonwealth and to engage in remunerative employment. To these ends, the General Assembly directs the Governor; the Virginia Board for People with Disabilities; the Departments of Education, Health, Housing and Community Development, Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and Social Services; the Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Blind and Vision Impaired, and the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing; and such other agencies as the Governor deems appropriate to provide, in a comprehensive and coordinated manner that makes the best use of available resources, those services necessary to assure equal opportunity to persons with disabilities in the Commonwealth.

The provisions of this title shall be known and may be cited as “The Virginians with Disabilities Act.”

History.

1985, c. 421, §

51.01-1

; 1990, c. 458; 1991, c. 563; 2002, c. 572; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2013, c. 571.

Cross references.

As to power of the Virginia Tourism Authority to update a travel guide for the disabled on a biennial basis, see §

2.2-2318

.

As to accessibility of polling places, see §

24.2-310

.

As to accessibility of registration places, see §

24.2-413

.

Editor’s note.

Title 51.01 has been recodified as Title 51.5 by the Virginia Code Commission for better arrangement in the Code. The order of sections within the title is not affected by the recodification. References in sections of Title 51.5 to other sections within the title have been changed to reflect the recodification.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 572 substituted “Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy” for “Department for Rights of Virginians with Disabilities” in the first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth”; and in the last sentence, substituted “the Virginia Board for People with Disabilities, the Departments of Education, Health, Housing and Community Development, Behavioral Health and Development Services, and Social Services, and the Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Blind and Vision impaired, and the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing” for “Department for the Aging, Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, Department of Education, Department of Health, Department of Housing and Community Development, Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, Board for Rights of Virginians with Disabilities, Department of Rehabilitative Services, Department of Social Services, Department of the Blind and Vision Impaired.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 571, in the second sentence, deleted “the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy” preceding “the Virginia Board,” deleted “and” preceding “the Departments for Aging,” and substituted “that” for “which.”

Law Review.

As to persons with disabilities, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 637 (1988).

For an article, “Reading Reasonableness Out of the ADA: Responding to Threats by Employees with Mental Illness Following Palmer,” see 84 Va. L. Rev. 509 (1999).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 29 The Order of Reference. § 29.17 Evidence Before Commissioner. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-221 Accessibility by Handicapped Persons. No. 16-301. Application for Tenancy.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3B M.J. Civil Rights, § 2.

§ 51.5-2.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 66 provides: “That on or after July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be the successor in interest to all rights, duties, or obligations created by a contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement of the Department for the Aging or the Department of Rehabilitative Services abolished pursuant to the 60th enactment of this act.”

Former §

51.5-2

, pertaining to plan of cooperation, derived from 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-2; 1990, c. 458; 1991, c. 563; 2002, c. 572; 2009, cc. 813, 840.